Utah statutes.
13-49-401.   Unlawful acts.

(1)  It is unlawful for an immigration consultant to:

(a)  make a false or misleading statement to a client while providing services to that client;

(b)  make a guarantee or promise to a client, unless the guarantee or promise is in writing and the immigration consultant has some basis in fact for making the guarantee or promise;

(c)  make a statement that the immigration consultant can or will obtain a special favor from or has special influence with the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, or any other governmental agency, employee, or official, that may have a bearing on a client's immigration matter; or

(d)  charge a client a fee for referral of the client to another person for services that the immigration consultant cannot or will not provide to the client.

(2)  A sign describing the prohibition described in Subsection (1)(d) shall be conspicuously displayed in the office of an immigration consultant.

